Georgia, session 2025_26, HB279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 8 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to sales and use
taxes, is amended in Code Section 48-8-2, relating to definitions regarding such taxes, by
revising paragraph (4) as follows:
"(4) 'Business' means any activity engaged in by any person or caused to be engaged in
by any person with the object of direct or indirect gain, benefit, or advantage."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
H. B. 279
- 1 -

LC 50 1026
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 279
- 2 -